Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.760

Limited jurisdiction courts—Limitation on liability for inadequate supervision or monitoring—Definitions.

(1) A limited jurisdiction court that provides misdemeanant supervision services is not liable for civil damages based on the inadequate supervision or monitoring of a misdemeanor defendant or probationer unless the inadequate supervision or monitoring constitutes gross negligence.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Limited jurisdiction court" means a district court or a municipal court, and anyone acting or operating at the direction of such court, including but not limited to its officers, employees, agents, contractors, volunteers, and others acting pursuant to an interlocal agreement.

(b) "Misdemeanant supervision services" means preconviction or postconviction misdemeanor probation or supervision services, or the monitoring of a misdemeanor defendant's compliance with a preconviction or postconviction order of the court, including but not limited to community corrections programs, probation supervision, pretrial supervision, or pretrial release services, including such services conducted pursuant to an interlocal agreement.

(3) This section does not create any duty and shall not be construed to create a duty where none exists. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect judicial immunity.

[ 2021 c 41 s 1; 2007 c 174 s 2.]